New Jersey, session 221, A3090.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area comprises  pine-oak forests, cedar swamps, and extensive surface and ground water  resources of high quality which provide a unique habitat for a wide diversity  of rare, threatened and endangered plant and animal species and contains many  other significant and unique natural, ecological, agricultural, scenic,  cultural and recreational resources;  that the continued viability of such area  and resources is threatened by pressures for residential, commercial and  industrial development;  that the protection of such area and resources is in  the interests of the people of this State and of the Nation; that such  protection will require the coordinated efforts of all relevant municipal,  county, State and Federal agencies;  that the Congress and President of the  United States have demonstrated a recognition of these facts through the  enactment of section 502 of the  "National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978"  (PL 95-625);  and, that it is now necessary to implement the afore-cited  Federal Act and insure the realization of pinelands protection through the  establishment of a regional planning and management commission empowered to  prepare and oversee the implementation of a comprehensive management plan for  the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. The Legislature further finds and declares that a certain portion of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area is especially vulnerable to the environmental degradation of surface and ground waters which would be occasioned by the improper development  or use thereof;  that the degradation of such waters would result in a severe  adverse impact upon the entire [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area;  that it is necessary to  designate this portion as a preservation area, wherein more stringent  restrictions on the development and use of land should be utilized and public  acquisition of land or interests therein should be concentrated; and, that in  order to facilitate such acquisition, and otherwise to effectuate the  provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act, it is further necessary to establish certain notice requirements and procedures for the purchase of land or interests therein in such area. The Legislature further finds and declares that the current pace of random and uncoordinated development and construction in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area poses an immediate threat to the resources thereof, especially to the survival of rare, threatened and endangered plant and animal species and the habitat thereof, and  to the maintenance of the existing high quality of surface and ground waters;   that such development and construction increase the risk and extent of  destruction of life and property which could be caused by the natural cycle of  forest fires in this unique area;  and, that, in order to effectuate the  purposes and provisions of [this act]  P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act, it is necessary to  impose certain interim limitations upon the local approval of applications for development in the preservation area, and upon certain State and local approvals in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, all as hereinafter provided. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.2) 2.    Section 3 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.  As used in [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.): a.  "Agricultural or horticultural purposes"  or  "agricultural or horticultural use"  means any production of plants or animals useful to man, including but not limited to:  forages or sod crops;  grains and feed crops; dairy animals and dairy products;  poultry and poultry products;  livestock, including beef cattle, sheep, swine, horses, ponies, mules or goats, and including the breeding and grazing of any or all of such animals;  bees and apiary products; fur animals; aquatic organisms as part of aquaculture; trees and forest products;  fruits of all kinds, including grapes, nuts and berries; vegetables;  nursery, floral, ornamental and greenhouse products;  or any land devoted to and meeting the requirements and qualifications for payments or other compensation pursuant to a soil conservation program under an agency of the Federal Government; b.  "Application for development"  means the application form and all accompanying documents required by municipal ordinance for approval of a subdivision plat, site plan, planned development, conditional use, zoning variance or other permit as provided in the  "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c. 291 (C. 40:55D-1 et seq.), for any use, development or construction other than the improvement, expansion or reconstruction of any single-family dwelling unit or appurtenance thereto, or the improvement, expansion, construction or reconstruction of any structure used exclusively for  agricultural or horticultural purposes; c.  "Commission" means the Pinelands Commission created by section 4 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-4); d.  "Comprehensive management plan" means the plan prepared and adopted by the commission pursuant to section 7 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-8); e.  "Council" means the Pinelands Municipal Council created by section 6.1 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-7); f.  "Federal Act" means section 502 of the "National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978" (Pub.L. 95-625); g.  "Major development" means any division or subdivision of land into five or more parcels; any construction or expansion of any housing development of five or more dwelling units; any construction or expansion of any commercial or industrial use or structure on a site of more than three acres; or any grading, clearing or disturbance of any area in excess of 5,000 square feet for other than agricultural or horticultural purposes; h.  ["Pinelands area"] John McPhee pinelands area means that area so designated by subsection a. of section 10 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11); i.  "Pinelands National Reserve"  means the approximately 1,000,000 acre area so designated by the Federal Act and generally depicted on the map entitled  "Pinelands National Reserve Boundary Map"  numbered NPS/80,011A and dated September, 1978; j.     "Preservation area" means that portion of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area so designated by subsection b. of section 10 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11); k.    "Protection area" means that portion of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area not included within the preservation area; l.     "Aquaculture" means the propagation, rearing, and subsequent harvesting of aquatic organisms in controlled or selected environments, and the subsequent processing, packaging and marketing and shall include but need not be limited to, activities to intervene in the rearing process to increase production such as stocking, feeding, transplanting and providing for protection from predators. "Aquaculture" shall not include the construction of facilities and appurtenant structures that might otherwise be regulated pursuant to any other State or federal law or regulation; m.   "Aquatic organism" means and includes, but need not be limited to, finfish, mollusks, crustaceans, and aquatic plants which are the property of a person engaged in aquaculture. (cf: P.L.1997, c.236, s.35) 3.    Section 5 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.  The commission shall consist of 15 members to be appointed and qualified as follows: (1) Seven residents of the State, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, except as otherwise provided herein; (2) Seven residents of the State, one resident each of the counties of Atlantic, Burlington, Camden, Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Ocean, appointed by the board of chosen freeholders of each such county;  provided, however, that in any county operating under the county executive plan or county  supervisor plan pursuant to the provisions of the  "Optional County Charter  Law,"  P.L.1972, c. 154 (C. 40:41A-1 et seq.), such appointment shall be made  by the county executive or the county supervisor, as the case may be; (3) One member to be appointed by the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior. Any appointments made prior to the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) by the Governor or by any of the respective counties to the planning entity established pursuant to the Federal Act shall be considered appointments made to the commission, and no such gubernatorial appointment shall be subject to the advice and consent of the Senate. b.  Commission members shall serve for terms of 3 years;  provided, however,  that of the first members appointed by the Governor, two shall serve 3 year  terms, two shall serve 2 year terms and three shall serve 1 year terms;  and  provided further, however, that of the first members appointed by the  respective counties, such members appointed from Atlantic and Burlington counties shall serve 1 year terms, such members appointed from Camden and Cape May counties shall serve 2 year terms, and such members appointed from Cumberland, Gloucester and Ocean counties shall serve 3 year terms.  Each member shall serve for the term of his appointment and until his successor shall have been appointed and qualified.  Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the unexpired term only.  The membership of the entire commission shall include residents of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area who represent economic activities, such as agriculture, in the area, as well as residents of the State who represent conservation interests. c.     Any member of the commission may be removed by the appointing authority, for cause, after a public hearing. d.    Each member of the commission, before entering upon his duties, shall take and subscribe an oath to perform the duties of his office faithfully, impartially, and justly to the best of his ability.  A record of such oaths shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State. e.     The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but the  commission may, within the limits or funds appropriated or otherwise made available for such purposes, reimburse its members for necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties. f.     The powers of the commission shall be vested in the members thereof in office, and a majority of the total authorized membership of the commission shall be required to exercise its powers at any meeting thereof. No alternate or designee of any commission member shall exercise any power to vote on any matter pending before the commission. g.    The Governor shall designate one of the members of the commission as chairman.  The commission shall appoint an executive director, who shall be the chief administrative officer thereof.  The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the commission, and shall be a person qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of his office. h.    A true copy of the minutes of every meeting of the commission shall be prepared and forthwith delivered to the Governor.  No action taken at such meeting by the commission shall have force or effect until 10 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays and public holidays, after such copy of the minutes shall  have been so delivered; provided, however, that no action taken with respect  to the adoption of the comprehensive management plan, or any portion thereof,  shall have force or effect until 30 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays and  public holidays, after such copy of the minutes shall have been so delivered.   If, in said 10-day period, or 30-day period, as the case may be, the Governor  returns such copy of the minutes with a veto of any action taken by the  commission at such meeting, such action shall be null and void and of no force  and effect. (cf: P.L.1980, c.65, s.1) 4.    Section 2 of P.L.2010, c.4 (C.13:18A-5.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Notwithstanding the provisions of the comprehensive management plan or any rule or regulation to the contrary, the commission shall not include solar panels in any calculation of impervious surface or impervious cover that may be required for an application for development in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. As used in this section, "solar panel" means an elevated panel or plate, or a canopy or array thereof, that captures and converts solar radiation to produce power, and includes flat plate, focusing solar collectors, or photovoltaic solar cells and excludes the base or foundation of the panel, plate, canopy, or array. (cf: P.L.2010, c.4, s.2) 5.    Section 6 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.    The Pinelands Commission shall have the following powers: a.     To adopt and from time to time amend and repeal suitable bylaws for the management of its affairs; b.    To adopt and use an official seal and alter the same at its pleasure; c.     To maintain an office at such place or places in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area as it may designate; d.    To sue and be sued in its own name; e.     To appoint, retain and employ, without regard to the provisions of Title  11A of the New Jersey Statutes but within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available for such purposes, such officers, agents, employees  and experts as it may require, and to determine the qualifications, terms of  office, duties, services and compensation therefor; f.     To apply for, receive, and accept, from any federal, State, or other public or private source, grants or loans for, or in aid of, the commission's authorized purposes; g.    To enter into any and all agreements or contracts, execute any and all instruments, and do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of the commission or to carry out any  power expressly given in [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); h.    To conduct examinations and investigations, to hear testimony, taken under oath at public or private hearings, on any material matter, and to require attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers; i.     To prepare and transmit to the Commissioner of Environmental Protection such recommendations for water quality standards for surface and ground waters in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, or in tributaries and watersheds thereof, as the commission deems appropriate; j.     To prepare, promulgate, adopt, amend or repeal, pursuant to the provisions of the  "Administrative Procedure Act,"  P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as are necessary in order to implement the provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); k.    To appoint advisory boards, commissions, or panels to assist in its activities; l.     To identify any lands in which the public acquisition of a fee simple or lesser interest therein is necessary or desirable in order to insure the preservation thereof, or to provide sites for public recreation, as well as  any lands the beneficial use of which are so adversely affected by the restrictions imposed pursuant to [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) as to require a guarantee of just compensation therefor, and to transmit such identifications to the affected local governments, the Commissioner of Environmental Protection and to the Secretary of the United States Department of Interior; m.   To call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of such employees of any State, county or municipal department, board, commission or agency as may be required and made available for such purposes; n.    To establish and change, in accordance with a fee schedule to be set forth by regulation adopted pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), reasonable fees for services performed relating to development review applications filed with the commission as required by the Comprehensive Management Plan. (cf: P.L.2003, c.117, s.30) 6.    Section 6.1 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-7) is amended to read as follows: 6.1.  a.  There is hereby established a Pinelands Municipal Council, the membership of which shall consist of the mayor, or his designee, of each municipality located, in whole or in part, within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. b.    (1)  Fifteen members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of council business. Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the council at any meeting thereof by the affirmative vote of a majority of those members of the council in attendance. (2)   The council shall draft and adopt bylaws to govern the proceedings of the council. c.     (1) The council shall meet at the call of the chairperson of the council or upon the concurrence of a majority of the full membership of the council. (2)   Notice of the agenda for each meeting shall be mailed by the chairperson to all members of the council at least seven calendar days in advance of the date of the meeting. d.    The council shall appoint a chairperson from among its members and such other officers as may be necessary until such time as elections may be held therefor as provided pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1995, c.272 (C.13:18A-7.1). e.     (1) Members of the council shall serve without compensation, and each member shall serve only as long as he is the mayor or the designee of the mayor of the municipality he represents.  The council may, within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available for such purposes, reimburse its members for necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties. (2)   The council may, within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available for such purposes, appoint such staff or hire such experts as it may require. f.     The commission shall submit to the council, for review, prior to final commission action thereon, the comprehensive management plan, and any revisions thereto, including the minimum standards for the adoption of municipal and county plans and ordinances concerning the development and use of land in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area.  The commission may also submit to the council any other matter that the commission deems advisable. g.    The council shall review all matters submitted to it by the commission and shall state its position to the commission and to all members of the council within 60 days of the submission thereof. h.    The council may make recommendations to the commission on any matters it deems advisable whether or not the matter was submitted to the council by the commission. The council shall mail to all members of the council any recommendations made to the commission at the time that the recommendations are submitted to the commission.  Members of the council may provide comments to the commission regarding the recommendations. (cf: P.L.1995, c.272, s.1) 7.    Section 7 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-8) is amended to read as follows: 7.    The commission shall, on or before August 8, 1980, and after public hearings held in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area and in other areas of the State at places of its choosing, prepare and adopt a comprehensive management plan for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area.  The portion or portions of the comprehensive management plan applicable to the preservation area shall be adopted on or before August 8, 1980.  The  portion or portions of the comprehensive management plan applicable to the  protection area shall be adopted on or after November 14, 1980, but in no case  later than December 15, 1980, and shall take effect on the thirty-first day  following adoption, except as otherwise expressly provided in subsection h. of  section 5 of P.L.1979, c. 111 (C. 13:18A-5). Such plan shall be periodically revised and updated, after public hearings, and shall include, but need not necessarily be limited to: a.     A resource assessment which: (1)   Determines the amount and type of human development and activity which the ecosystem of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area can sustain while still maintaining the overall ecological values thereof, with special reference to ground and surface  water supply and quality;  natural hazards, including fire; endangered,  unique, and unusual plants and animals and biotic communities; ecological  factors relating to the protection and enhancement of blueberry, cranberry and  other agricultural production or activity;  air quality;  and other appropriate  considerations affecting the ecological integrity of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area; (2) Includes an assessment of scenic, aesthetic, cultural, open space, and outdoor recreation resources of the area, together with a determination of overall policies required to maintain and enhance such resources;  and (3) Utilizes soil resources information from the National Co-operative Soil Survey and the soil conservation districts in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. b.    A map showing the detailed boundary of the Pinelands National Reserve, such map to delineate: (1) Major areas within the boundary which are of critical ecological importance; (2) Major areas and resources adjacent to the boundary that have significance to the ecological integrity of the Pinelands National Reserve; and (3) Areas of scenic, open space, cultural, and recreational significance. c.     The map prepared pursuant to subsection c. of section 10 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11). d.    A land use capability map and a comprehensive statement of policies for planning and managing the development and use of land in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, which policies shall: (1) Consider and detail the application of a variety of land and water protection and management techniques, including but not limited to, zoning and regulation derived from State and local police powers, development and use standards, permit systems, acquisition of conservation easements and other interest in land, public access agreements with private landowners, purchase of  land for resale or lease-back, fee acquisition of public recreation sites and  ecologically sensitive areas, transfer of development rights, dedication of  private lands for recreation or conservation purposes and any other appropriate  method of land and water protection and management which will help meet the  goals and carry out the policies of the management plan; (2) Include a policy for the use of State and local police power responsibilities to the greatest extent practicable to regulate the use of land  and water resources in a manner consistent with the purposes and provisions of  [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act;  and (3) Recognize existing economic activities within the area and provide for the protection and enhancement of such activities as farming, forestry, proprietary recreational facilities, and those indigenous industries and commercial and residential developments which are consistent with such purposes and provisions. e.     A coordination and consistency component which details the ways in which local, State, and Federal programs and policies may best be coordinated to promote the goals and policies of the management plan, and which details how land, water, and structures managed by governmental or non-governmental entities in the public interest within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area may be integrated into the management plan. f.     A public use component including, but not limited to, a detailed program to inform the public of appropriate uses of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. g.    A financial component, together with a cash flow timetable which: (1) Details the cost of implementing the management plan, including, but not  limited to, payments in lieu-of-taxes, acquisition, within 5 years of the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), of fee simple or other interests in lands for preservation or recreation purposes, compensation guarantees, general administrative costs, and any anticipated extraordinary or continuing costs; and (2) Details the sources of revenue for covering such costs, including, but not limited to, grants, donations, and loans from local, State, and Federal departments and agencies, and from the private sector. h.    A program to provide for the maximum feasible local government and public participation in the management of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. i.     A program for State and local governmental implementation of the comprehensive management plan and the various elements thereof in a manner that  will insure the continued, uniform, and consistent protection of the [pinelands area] John McPhee  pinelands area in accord with the purposes and provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal  Act, including: (1) Minimum standards for the adoption, as required in section 11 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-12), of municipal and county plans and ordinances concerning the development and use of land in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, including, but not limited to, standards for minimum lot sizes and stream setbacks, maximum appropriate population densities, and regulated or prohibited uses for specific portions of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area; and (2) Such guidelines for any State or local agencies as may be prepared by the commission pursuant to section 12 hereof. j.  In conjunction with existing State programs and planning processes, a plan to implement the provisions of the  "Clean Water Act"  (P.L. 95-217) and the "Safe Drinking Water Act"  (P.L. 93-523) which pertain to the surface and ground water of the Pinelands National Reserve; k.    The report transmitted to the commission by the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to section 22 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-23). (cf: P.L.1980, c.65, s.2) 8.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.285 (C.13:18A-8.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Field sports, including but not limited to soccer and soccer tournaments, conducted or occurring in an agricultural production area within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, shall constitute a low intensity recreational use under the comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant to the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), provided that no permanent structure is established to accommodate the use. (cf: P.L.2015, c.285, s.1) 9.    Section 8 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-9) is amended to read as follows: 8.    a.  The goal of the comprehensive management plan with respect to the entire [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall be to protect, preserve and enhance the significant values of the resources thereof in a manner which is consistent with the purposes and provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act. b.    The goals of the comprehensive management plan with respect to the protection area shall be to: (1) Preserve and maintain the essential character of the existing pinelands environment, including the plant and animal species indigenous thereto and the habitat therefor; (2) Protect and maintain the quality of surface and ground waters; (3) Promote the continuation and expansion of agricultural and horticultural uses; (4) Discourage piecemeal and scattered development; and (5) Encourage appropriate patterns of compatible residential, commercial and industrial development, in or adjacent to areas already utilized for such purposes, in order to accommodate regional growth influences in an orderly way while protecting the pinelands environment from the individual and cumulative adverse impacts thereof. c.     The goals of the comprehensive management plan with respect to the preservation area shall be to: (1) Preserve an extensive and contiguous area of land in its natural state, thereby insuring the continuation of a pinelands environment which contains the unique and significant ecological and other resources representative of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area; (2) Promote compatible agricultural, horticultural and recreational uses, including hunting, fishing and trapping, within the framework of maintaining a pinelands environment; (3) Prohibit any construction or development which is incompatible with the preservation of this unique area; (4) Provide a sufficient amount of undeveloped land to accommodate specific wilderness management practices, such as selective burning, which are necessary to maintain the special ecology of the preservation area; and (5) Protect and preserve the quantity and quality of existing surface and ground waters. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.8) 10.  Section 9 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-10) is amended to read as follows: 9.    a. During the development of the comprehensive management plan, the commission shall consult with appropriate officials of local governments, including the council, and State or Federal agencies with jurisdiction over lands, waters and natural resources within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, with interested professional, scientific, and citizen organizations, and with any citizens advisory committee which may be established by the Governor. The commission shall review all relevant existing information and studies on the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area including, but not limited to, the report of the committee created pursuant to Executive Order 56, issued May 28, 1977. b.    Upon the adoption thereof, the comprehensive management plan shall be submitted to the Governor and to the Legislature.  The commission shall further submit such plan to the Secretary of the United States Department of Interior, as provided in the Federal Act. c.     Subsequent to the adoption of the comprehensive management plan, the provisions of any other law, ordinance, rule or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding, no application for development within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall  be approved by any municipality, county or agency thereof, and no State approval, certificate, license, consent, permit, or financial assistance for the construction of any structure or the disturbance of any land within such area shall be granted, unless such approval or grant conforms to the provisions  of such comprehensive management plan; provided, however, that the commission  is hereby authorized to waive strict compliance with such plan or with any  element or standard contained therein, upon finding that such waiver is  necessary to alleviate extraordinary hardship or to satisfy a compelling public  need, is consistent with the purposes and provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the  Federal Act, and would not result in substantial impairment of the resources of  the [pinelands area]; John McPhee pinelands area and provided further, however, that the commission shall, within 90 days of the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), and after public hearing thereon, adopt rules and regulations which specify the standards for determining such extraordinary hardship, compelling public need, consistency and substantial impairment. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.9) 11.  Section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11) is amended to read as follows: 10.  a.  The [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall consist of all that area within the boundaries described herein: Beginning at the intersection of the abandoned-right-of-way of the Pennsylvania Railroad and the Garden State Parkway near south Toms River; thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with the boundary of the Bass River State Forest;  thence southerly, and then westerly, along the Bass River State Forest boundary to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway;  thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with Atlantic County Alternate Route 559; thence northwesterly along Atlantic County Alternate Route 559 to its intersection with Atlantic County Route 559 at Gravelly Run;  thence northwesterly along Atlantic County Route 559 to its intersection with U.S. 40 and N.J. Route 50 at Mays Landing; thence westerly along U.S. 40 and N.J. Route 50 to their intersection with N.J. Route 50;  thence southerly on N.J. Route 50 to its intersection with Buck  Hill Road near Buck Hill; thence westerly along Buck Hill Road (River Road) to  its intersection with N.J. Route 49;  thence southeasterly along N.J. Route 49  to its intersection with N.J. Route 50; thence southeasterly along N.J. Route  50 to its intersection with Cape May County Route 610; thence southwesterly along Cape May County Route 610 to its intersection with N.J. Route 47 at Dennisville;  thence northwesterly along N.J. Route 47 to its intersection with  the east bank of the Manamuskin River; thence northerly along the east bank of  the Manamuskin River to N.J. Route 49;  thence northwesterly along N.J. Route  49 to its intersection with Cumberland County Route 671; thence northerly  along Cumberland County Route 671 and then Atlantic County Route 671 (both  known as Union Road) to Atlantic County Route 557;  thence northwesterly along  Atlantic County Route 557 to its intersection with U.S. Route 40;  thence  northwesterly along U.S. Route 40 to its intersection with Gloucester County  Route 555;  thence northerly along Gloucester County Route 555 to its  intersection with U.S. Route 322 and Gloucester County Route 536;  thence  easterly along Gloucester County Route 536 (known as New Brooklyn Road) to its  intersection with Camden County Route 705 at New Brooklyn Lake;  thence  northerly along the western shoreline of New Brooklyn Lake to the east bank of  the main stem of the Great Egg Harbor River;  thence northerly along the east  bank of the main stem of the Great Egg Harbor River to its intersection with  the east bank of Tinkers Branch; thence northeasterly along the east bank of  Tinkers Branch to its intersection with the corporate boundary of Berlin  Borough;  thence easterly along the Berlin Borough corporate boundary to its  intersection with the boundary of that area designated as the critical area for  sewerage purposes pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1954, c. 199 (C. 58:11-23  et seq.), as amended, and as implemented by N.J.A.C. 7:9-10.1 et seq.;  thence northerly and then easterly along such critical area boundary to its intersection with the Burlington County-Camden County boundary;  thence northerly along the Burlington County-Camden County boundary to its intersection with N.J. Route 73;  thence northerly along N.J. Route 73 to its  intersection with Braddock Mill Road; thence easterly along Braddock Mill Road  to its intersection with Tomlinson Mill Road;  thence northeasterly along  Tomlinson Mill Road to its intersection with Kettle Run Road;  thence northerly  along Kettle Run Road, then along Willow Corner-Tomlinson Mill Road, to its  intersection with South Elmwood Road; thence easterly, then northerly along  South Elmwood Road to its intersection with East Main Street;  thence easterly  along East Main Street to its intersection with Marlton Pike;  thence  northeasterly along Marlton Pike to its intersection with N.J. Route 70;   thence easterly along N.J. Route 70 to its intersection with U.S. Route 206;   thence northerly along U.S. Route 206 to its intersection with Burlington  County Route 530; thence easterly along Burlington County Route 530 to the  corporate boundary of Pemberton Borough; thence southerly, then easterly, then  northerly, and then westerly, along the Pemberton Borough corporate boundary to  its intersection with Burlington County Route 616;  thence northerly along Burlington County Route 616 to its intersection with Burlington County Route 663;  thence northerly along Burlington County Route 663 to its intersection with the corporate boundary of Springfield Township;  thence easterly along the Springfield Township corporate boundary to its intersection with the boundary of the Fort Dix Military Reservation/McGuire Air Force Base; thence easterly along the boundary of the Fort Dix Military Reservation/McGuire Air Force Base to its intersection with Ocean County Route 539;  thence northwesterly along Ocean County Route 539 to its intersection with Ocean County Route 528; thence  northeasterly along Ocean County Route 528 to its intersection with Ocean  County Route 547;  thence southerly along Ocean County Route 547 to its intersection with Ocean County Route 527;  thence southeasterly along Ocean County Route 527 to its intersection with the Central Railroad of New Jersey tracks;  thence southwesterly along the tracks of the Central Railroad of New Jersey to the junction with the abandoned right-of-way of the Pennsylvania Railroad near Whiting;  thence easterly along the abandoned Pennsylvania Railroad right-of-way to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway near South Toms River, at the point of origin. b.    The preservation area shall consist of all that area within the boundaries described herein: Beginning at the crossing of the Mullica River and the Garden State Parkway;   thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with  Atlantic County Route 624; thence northwesterly along Atlantic County Route  624 to its intersection with Atlantic County Route 563;  thence northwesterly  along Atlantic County Route 563 to its intersection with Elwood-Weekstown Road  at Weekstown;  thence westerly along Elwood-Weekstown Road to its intersection  with Atlantic County Route 643;  thence northwesterly along Atlantic County  Route 643 to an unnamed local road south of Nescochague Lake;  thence westerly  along such unnamed local road to its intersection with Atlantic County Route  542;  thence northeasterly along Atlantic County Route 542 to its intersection  with the boundary of Wharton State Forest;  thence northwesterly along the  Wharton State Forest boundary to its intersection with the Mullica River;   thence westerly along the Mullica River to its intersection with the corporate boundary of Medford Township;  thence northerly along the Medford Township corporate boundary to its intersection with the boundary of that area designated as the critical area for sewerage purposes pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1954, c. 199 (C. 58:11-23 et seq.), as amended, and as implemented by N.J.A.C. 7:9-10.1 et seq.;  thence northeasterly along such critical area boundary to its intersection with the boundary of Wharton State  Forest; thence easterly along the Wharton State Forest boundary to its  intersection with Medford-Atsion Road, south of Dellette;  thence northerly  along Medford-Atsion Road to its intersection with Willow Grove Road;  thence northeasterly along Willow Grove Road to its intersection with Stokes Road; thence southerly along Stokes Road to its intersection with Burnt House Road; thence northeasterly along Burnt House Road to its intersection with Fork Neck Road;  thence southerly, then easterly along Fork Neck Road to its intersection  with Dingletown Road;  thence northeasterly along Dingletown Road to its  intersection with Hampton Gate-Caranza Road;  thence northwesterly along  Hampton Gate-Caranza Road to its intersection with Burlington County Route 532;   thence easterly on Burlington County Route 532 to its intersection with Patty  Bowker Road and Irick's Causeway Road;  thence northeasterly along Irick's  Causeway Road to its intersection with Vincentown-South Park Road; thence  southeasterly along Vincentown-South Park Road to its intersection with Sooy  Place Road; thence easterly along Sooy Place Road to its intersection with the corporate boundary of Woodland Township;  thence northwesterly, then northeasterly, along the Woodland Township corporate boundary to its intersection with the boundary of Lebanon State Forest and Burlington County Route 644 at Four Mile Circle;  thence northwesterly, then northeasterly, then southeasterly, along the Lebanon State Forest boundary to its intersection with  N.J. Route 70;  thence northeasterly along N.J. Route 70 to its intersection  with the Lebanon State Forest boundary at a point approximately one-half mile  west of the intersection of N.J. Route 70 and Burlington County Route 530;   thence westerly, and then northerly, along the Lebanon State Forest boundary  to its intersection with the boundary of the Fort Dix Military Reservation near South Boundary Road;  thence northwesterly along the Fort Dix Military Reservation boundary to its intersection with Burlington County Route 667; thence northerly along Burlington County Route 667 to its intersection with the northern boundary of the Fort Dix Military Reservation;  thence easterly along the Fort Dix Military Reservation boundary to its intersection with the boundary of the Colliers Mills Fish and Wildlife Management Area; thence northerly along the Colliers Mills Fish and Wildlife Management Area boundary to its intersection with Ocean County Route 528;  thence northeasterly along Ocean County Route 528 to its easternmost intersection with the Colliers Mills Fish and Wildlife Management Area boundary;  thence southerly along the Colliers Mills Fish and Wildlife Management Area boundary to its intersection with the boundary of the Lakehurst Naval Air Station;  thence easterly, then southerly, and then westerly along the Lakehurst Naval Air Station boundary to its intersection with an unnamed local road at the northeastern corner of the boundary of the Manchester Fish and Wildlife Management Area;  thence southerly  along such unnamed local road, then along Beckerville Road, to its intersection  with N.J. Route 70;  thence southwesterly along N.J. Route 70 to its  intersection with the boundary of the Fort Dix Military Reservation; thence  southerly, and then northwesterly, along the Fort Dix Military Reservation  boundary to its intersection with the boundary of the Lebanon State Forest;   thence southerly along the Lebanon State Forest Boundary to its intersection  with the boundary of the Pasadena Fish and Wildlife Management Area;  thence southeasterly along the Pasadena Fish and Wildlife Management Area boundary to  its intersection with the northern ridge line of the Cedar Creek Drainage  Basin;  thence northeasterly along the northern ridge line of the Cedar Creek  Drainage Basin to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway;  thence  southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with the southern  ridge line of the Cedar Creek Drainage Basin; thence southwesterly along the  southern ridge line of the Cedar Creek Drainage Basin to its intersection with  the boundary of the Greenwood Forest Fish and Wildlife Management Area;  thence  southeasterly along the Greenwood Forest Fish and Wildlife Management Area to  its intersection with N.J. Route 72;  thence northwesterly along N.J. Route 72  to its intersection with the East Branch of the Oswego River;  thence southerly along the East Branch of the Oswego River to its intersection with Ocean County  Route 539;  thence southerly along Ocean County Route 539 to its intersection  with the boundary of the Stafford Forge Fish and Wildlife Management Area;   thence southeasterly along the Stafford Forge Fish and Wildlife Management  Area to its intersection with the north bank of Governors Branch Creek;  thence easterly along the north bank of Governors Branch Creek to its intersection with the boundary of the Stafford Forge Fish and Wildlife Management Area; thence easterly along the Stafford Forge Fish and Wildlife Management Area boundary to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway;  thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with the boundary of Bass River State Forest;  thence southerly, and then westerly, along the Bass River State Forest boundary to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway; thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to its intersection with the east bank of the Bass River;  thence northerly along the east bank of the Bass River to its intersection with the east bank of the East Branch of the Bass River; thence northerly along the east bank of the East Branch of the Bass River to its intersection with the Atlantic City Electric Company transmission line;  thence westerly, and then southwesterly, along the Atlantic City Electric Company transmission line to its intersection with Burlington County Route 542;  thence easterly along Burlington County Route 524 to its intersection with Burlington County Route 167;  thence southerly along Burlington County Route 167 to its intersection with the Garden State Parkway at exit 50S;  thence southerly along the Garden State Parkway to the crossing of the Mullica River, at the point of origin. c.     The commission shall, within 120 days of the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), prepare a detailed map of the Pinelands National Reserve, the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, the protection area and the preservation area.  Such map shall include, but need not be limited to, the location of all major waterways, roads, and publicly-owned lands in such areas, as well as a depiction of the boundaries of every county and municipality which is located in whole or in part within such areas.  Such map shall be transmitted to the governing body of every such county and municipality, shall be published in the New Jersey Register and in at least two newspapers circulating within the affected areas, within 150 days of said effective date, and shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature as the official State planning maps of the Pinelands National Reserve, the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, the protection area and the preservation area. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.10) 12.  Section 11 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-12) is amended to read as follows: 11.  a.  The provisions of any other law, ordinance, rule or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding, within one year of the date of the adoption of the comprehensive management plan, or any revision thereof, each county located in whole or in part in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall submit to the commission such revisions of the county master plan as may be necessary in order to implement the objectives of the comprehensive management plan and conform with the minimum standards contained therein.  After receiving and reviewing such revisions, as applicable to the development and use of land in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, the commission shall approve, reject, or approve with conditions said revised plans, as it deems appropriate, after public hearing, within 60 days of the submission thereof. Upon rejecting or conditionally approving any such revised plan, the commission shall identify such changes therein that it deems necessary for commission approval thereof, and the relevant county shall adopt and enforce such plan, as so changed. b.  Within one year of the date of the adoption of the comprehensive management plan, or any revision thereof, each municipality located in whole or in part in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall submit to the commission such revisions of the municipal master plan and local land use ordinances as may be necessary in order to implement the objectives of the comprehensive management plan and conform with the minimum standards contained therein. After receiving and reviewing such revisions, as applicable to the development and use of land in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, the commission shall approve, reject, or approve with conditions said revised plans and ordinances, as it deems appropriate, after public hearing, within 120 days of the date of the submission thereof.  The number of low or moderate income housing units provided for in the revised plan shall not be used by the commission as a criterion for the approval, rejection, or conditional approval of the revised plan. Upon rejecting or conditionally approving any such revised plan or ordinance, the commission shall identify such changes therein that it deems necessary for commission approval thereof, and the relevant municipality shall adopt and enforce such plan or ordinance, as so changed. The commission may, as herein provided, delegate the review of any municipal master plan or land use ordinance to the planning board of the county wherein such municipality is located.  Any such delegation shall be made only:  (1) upon a finding by the commission that such delegation is consistent with the purposes and provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act; (2) if the commission has approved the master plan for such county; and (3) at the request of the governing body of such county.  The results of any such county planning board review shall be transmitted to the commission prior to the commission's review and approval of any such municipal master plan or ordinance. c.  In the event that any county or municipality fails to adopt or enforce an approved revised master plan or implementing land use ordinances, as the case may be, including any condition thereto imposed by the commission, the commission shall adopt and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the minimum standards contained in the comprehensive management plan as applicable to any such county or municipality. d.  Any approval of any application for development granted by any municipality, county, or agency thereof in violation of the provisions of this section shall be null and void and of no force and effect at law or equity. (cf: P.L.1987, c.267, s.1) 13.  Section 12 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-13) is amended to read as follows: 12.  In order to assure that the actions, decisions, determinations and rulings of the State, county and municipal governments shall, to the maximum extent practicable and feasible, conform with the comprehensive management plan adopted by the commission pursuant to section 7 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-8), the commission shall prepare, periodically revise and transmit to all State, county or municipal agencies empowered to finance or construct any capital project within  the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, and to all State agencies empowered to grant or deny any  approval, certificate, license, consent, or permit for the construction of any  structure or the disturbance of land therein, such guidelines for the location and construction of such capital projects or for the granting of any such approval, certificate, license, consent, permit, or financial assistance, as the case may be, as the commission deems necessary and appropriate. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.12) 14.  Section 13 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-14) is amended to read as follows: 13. Subsequent to the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), the provisions of any other law, ordinance, rule or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding: a.     No State department, division, commission, authority, council, agency or  board shall grant any approval, certificate, license, consent, permit or financial assistance for the construction of any structure or the disturbance of any land within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, for other than agricultural or horticultural purposes prior to the adoption of the comprehensive management plan;  provided, however, that such grant may be made for such construction or disturbance within the protection area prior to such adoption if the commission  finds that such grant is necessary to alleviate extraordinary hardship, or to  satisfy a compelling public need, or is consistent with the purposes and  provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act, and would not result in substantial  impairment of the resources of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area;  and provided further,  however, that such grant may be made for such construction or disturbance  within the preservation area if the commission finds that such grant is  necessary to alleviate extraordinary hardship or to satisfy a compelling public  need, and is consistent with the purposes and provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act, and would not result in substantial impairment of the resources of  the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. b.  No application for a major development in the protection area shall be approved by any municipality, county or agency thereof, prior to the adoption of the comprehensive management plan;  provided, however, that such an application may be approved if the commission finds that such approval is necessary to alleviate extraordinary hardship or to satisfy a compelling public  need, or is consistent with the purposes and provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the  Federal Act, and would not result in substantial impairment of the resources of  the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. c.  No application for development in the preservation area shall be approved by any municipality, county, or agency thereof prior to the adoption of the comprehensive management plan and the approval, pursuant to section 11 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-12), of the master plan and land use ordinances applicable to any such municipality, county, or agency thereof;  provided, however, that such an application may be approved prior to such adoption and approval if the commission finds that such approval is necessary to alleviate extraordinary hardship or to satisfy a compelling public need, and is consistent with the purposes and provisions of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the Federal Act, and would not result in substantial impairment of the resources of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. d.    Any approval, certificate, license, consent, permit, or financial assistance granted in violation of this section shall be null and void and of no force and effect at law or equity. e.     The commission shall, within 90 days of the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), and after public hearing thereon, adopt rules and regulations which specify the standards for determining such extraordinary hardship, compelling public need, consistency and substantial impairment for the purposes of this section. f.  The executive director is hereby authorized and directed to review all requests or applications for a commission finding pursuant to this section and to make such recommendations thereon to the commission as he shall deem appropriate;  provided, however, that the commission shall take final action on  all such requests or applications. g.  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the granting of any State, county  or municipal approval, certificate, license, consent or permit for the construction of any single family residence upon any existing lot in the protection area, provided that (1) the lot upon which such residence would be constructed was owned, as of February 7, 1979, by the person who would occupy such residence;  and (2) that sewage treatment facilities, within the capacity of an existing sewage treatment plant, are available to service such residence,  or, where no such facilities are available, that such residence would be  constructed upon a lot greater than one acre. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.13) 15.  Section 14 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-15) is amended to read as follows: 14.  Subsequent to the adoption of the comprehensive management plan, the commission is hereby authorized to commence a review, within 15 days after any final municipal or county approval thereof, of any application for development in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area.  Upon determining to exercise such authority, the commission shall transmit, by certified mail, written notice thereof to the person who submitted such application.  The commission shall, after public hearing thereon, approve, reject, or approve with conditions any such application within 45 days of transmitting such notice; provided, however, that such application shall not be rejected or conditionally approved unless the commission determines that such development does not conform with the comprehensive management plan or the minimum standards contained therein, as applicable to the county or municipality wherein such development is located, or that such development could result in substantial impairment of the resources of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area.  Such approval, rejection or conditional approval shall be binding upon the person who submitted such application, shall supersede any municipal or county approval of any such development, and shall be subject only to judicial review as provided in section 19 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-20). The number of low or moderate income housing units provided for in the application for development shall not be used as a criterion for the approval or rejection of the application. (cf: P.L.1987, c.267, s.2) 16.  Section 1 of P.L.2011, c.141 (C.13:18A-15.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Within 180 days after the date of enactment of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), the Pinelands Commission shall adopt rules and regulations providing for the approval of the development of a solar or photovoltaic energy facility or structure in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area on the site of a landfill or resource extraction operation, provided that the development is consistent with the comprehensive management plan, adopted pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-8), and: (1)   if located on a resource extraction site, the facility or structure shall be on previously disturbed lands that have not subsequently been restored, and which are not subject to any restoration obligation pursuant to the comprehensive management plan; or (2)   if located on a landfill, the facility or structure shall be on previously disturbed lands or on adjacent lands as necessary to facilitate closure of the landfill in accordance with a plan approved by the Pinelands Commission in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection.  The landfill shall be closed in accordance with a plan approved by the commission, in consultation with the department, under the requirements of the comprehensive management plan prior to, or concurrent with, the installation of the solar or photovoltaic energy facility or structure. b.    In addition to the conditions set forth in subsection a. of this section, development of the facility or structure shall not permanently or adversely impact: (1) any existing engineering devices or other environmental controls located on a site, except as may be approved by the Pinelands Commission in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection; and (2) ecologically sensitive areas located on, adjacent to, or within the same sub-watershed as the site proposed for development, except as may be approved by the commission in consultation with the department. c.     Within one year after the termination of use of the solar or photovoltaic energy facility or structure, the facility, and all structures associated therewith, shall be removed and restoration of the site shall be completed in accordance with the comprehensive management plan, or within another time period as approved by the Pinelands Commission, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection and under the requirements of the comprehensive management plan. (cf: P.L.2011, c.141, s.1) 17.  Section 20 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-21) is amended to read as follows: 20.  The commission shall, within 1 year of the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), prepare and submit to the Governor and Legislature a report concerning State payments in lieu of taxes to municipalities in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area wherein the State owns any land or interests therein.  Such report shall include an evaluation of the manner of calculation and amount of such payments made or to be made pursuant to the provisions of the  "New Jersey Green Acres and Recreation Opportunities Bond Act of 1974,"  P.L.1974, c. 102;  P.L.1977, c. 272 (C. 54:4-2.2a et seq.);  and the  "New Jersey Green Acres Bond Act of 1978,"  P.L.1978, c. 118, as well as the recommendations of the commission for executive and legislative action on additional or alternative proposals for such payments, including the fiscal implications of any such proposal and potential sources of funding therefor. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.20) 18.  Section 23 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-24) is amended to read as follows: 23. a.  No person shall operate any power vessel which utilizes any engine in excess of 10 horse power upon any of the waters of this State within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, except upon that portion of the Mullica River downstream from Burlington County Route 542, upon that portion of the Great Egg Harbor River downstream from its confluence with Mare Run, or upon that portion of the Wading River downstream from its confluence with the Oswego River.  As used in this subsection, "power vessel" means any vessel temporarily or permanently equipped with machinery for propulsion, not including a vessel propelled wholly by sails or by muscular power. b.  No person shall operate any motor vehicle upon any public land within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area other than upon public highways, except in such areas designated by the commission for such purposes.  As used in this subsection, "motor vehicle" means all vehicles propelled other than by muscular power, but not including those vehicles run only upon rails or tracks, police, fire or emergency vehicles, or those vehicles utilized for the administration or maintenance of any public land. c.  No person shall throw, drop, discard or otherwise place any litter upon any land or water within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area.  As used in this subsection, "litter" means any paper, bottle, can, trash, garbage, refuse or debris of any nature. d.  Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be liable to a penalty of not more than $500.00 for each offense, which penalty shall be imposed in addition to any other penalty otherwise provided by P.L.1954, c.38 (C.23:7-9), R.S.39:4-64, or by any other law. Such penalty shall be collected by the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to the provisions of "the penalty enforcement law" (N.J.S.2A:58-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.1992, c.69, s.1) 19.  Section 24 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-25) is amended to read as follows: 24.  a.  Nothing in [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) shall be construed to authorize or permit the exportation of any ground or surface waters from the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. b.    Nothing in [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) shall be construed to authorize any regulation of hunting, fishing, trapping or possession of wildlife, or other recreational activities in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, except as otherwise provided in section 23 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-24) or by Title 13 or Title 23 of the Revised Statutes. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.24) 20.  Section 25 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-26) is amended to read as follows: 25.  The commission is hereby authorized to adopt rules and regulations which impose a surcharge of up to $1.00 upon any fee currently levied and collected, pursuant to law, for the use of State-owned lands within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. All of the sums collected as a result of any such surcharge shall be deposited in a fund to be known as the "Pinelands Fund," which fund shall be kept separate from all other State receipts. There shall be appropriated annually from such fund, in accordance with a formula adopted by the commission, such revenue as may be available to defray the costs of payments in lieu-of-taxes, as herein provided, to municipalities located in whole or in part in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.25) 21.  Section 28 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-29) is amended to read as follows: 28.  The object, design and purpose of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) being the protection of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area and the resources thereof, [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) shall be liberally construed. (cf: P.L.1979, c.111, s.28) 22.  Section 2 of P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-31) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The Legislature finds and declares that, pursuant to the provisions of P.L. 1979, c. 111 (C. 13:18A-1 et seq.), the comprehensive management plan for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area has been adopted and is now being implemented; that this plan includes a program for the allocation and transfer of pinelands development credits; and that the intent of the pinelands development credit program is to provide a mechanism to facilitate both the preservation of the resources of this area and the accommodation of regional growth influences in an orderly fashion. The Legislature further finds and declares that the concept of transferable development credits is innovative and, as yet, unprecedented on a regional scale; that in order to realize the full measure of the benefits of such a program, steps must be taken to assure the marketability of these credits; and that the best means of providing this assurance is through the establishment of a Pinelands Development Credit Bank empowered to purchase and sell pinelands development credits and to guarantee loans secured thereby, all as hereinafter provided. (cf: P.L.1985, c.310, s.2) 23. Section 4 of P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-33) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  There is established in the Executive Branch of the State Government a public body corporate and politic, with corporate succession, to be known as the Pinelands Development Credit Bank.  For the purpose of complying with the provisions of Article V, Section IV, paragraph 1 of the New Jersey Constitution, the bank is allocated within the Department of Banking, but notwithstanding that allocation, the bank shall be independent of any supervision or control by the department or by an officer or employee thereof, except as otherwise expressly provided in [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.).  The bank is constituted as an instrumentality of the State exercising public and essential governmental functions, and the exercise by the bank of the powers conferred by [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) shall be deemed and held to be an essential governmental function of the State. b.  The bank shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of five ex officio members, or the designees thereof, as follows:  the Commissioner of Banking, who shall serve as chairman; the Secretary of Agriculture; the Attorney General; the Commissioner of Environmental Protection; and the Chairman of the Pinelands Commission; and four members, each of whom shall be a resident of counties in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, two to be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the President of the Senate, and two to be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the General Assembly. Designees of the five ex officio members shall have the power to vote in the absence of members. (cf: P.L.1985, c.310, s.4) 24.  Section 7 of P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-36) is amended to read as follows: 7.    a.  The board shall establish and maintain a Registry of Pinelands Development Credits, which shall include: (1)  The name and address of every owner to whom a pinelands development credit certificate is issued pursuant to section 6 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-6), the date of its issuance, the municipal tax lot and block identification of the parcels of land to which the pinelands development credit has been assigned, the number of pinelands development credits or fraction thereof assigned to each parcel, the total number of pinelands development credits assigned, and the total acreage to which pinelands development credits have been assigned; (2)  The name and address of every person to whom a pinelands development credit is sold or otherwise conveyed, the date of the conveyance, and the consideration, if any, received therefor; (3)  The name and address of any person who has pledged a pinelands development credit as security on any loan or other obligation, the name and address of the lender, and the date, amount and term of the loan or obligation; (4)  The name and address of any person who has redeemed a pinelands development credit, the location of the land to which the credit was transferred, and the date this redemption was made; and (5)  An annual enumeration of the total number of pinelands development credits purchased and transferred, listing the municipality in which the land for which each pinelands development credit was issued is located, and the municipality to which the pinelands development credit was transferred. b.   No person shall purchase or otherwise acquire, encumber, or redeem any pinelands development credit without recording that fact, within 10 business days thereof, with the bank. c.    The board shall make available in the form of an annual report the information included in the registry to each county and municipality located in whole or in part in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, and, upon request, pertinent information to any other person.  The first annual report shall be submitted to the Governor and Legislature and shall be made available to the public on the first anniversary of the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.1985, c.310, s.7) 25.  Section 14 of P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-43) is amended to read as follows: 14.  a.  The governing body of any county located in whole or in part within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area may, by resolution duly adopted, create a public body to carry out the functions of the bank created herein within the jurisdiction of the county with all or any significant part of the name of the county inserted.  The county bank shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of five members, appointed by the board of chosen freeholders, or, in the counties operating under the county executive plan or county supervisor plan pursuant to the provisions of the "Optional County Charter Law," P.L. 1972, c. 154 (C. 40:41A-1 et seq.), by the county executive or the county supervisor, as the case may be, with the advice and consent of the board of chosen freeholders. b.  The members of the county board shall be appointed from among residents of the county with substantive experience in agriculture, banking and finance, land use regulation, and the law.  Nothing contained herein shall be construed to preempt a county from carrying out functions substantially similar to those described and authorized herein exclusive of any State assistance. (cf: P.L.1985, c.310, s.14) 26.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.232 (C.13:18A-50) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Environmental Protection, utilizing any monies that may be made available from any source for the purpose, may acquire on behalf of the State from willing sellers any land or interest therein that qualifies for acquisition pursuant to the limited practical use program for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area as set forth in section 502(k)(2)(C) of the "National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978," Pub.L.95-625 (16 U.S.C.471i(k)(2)(C)), and pay any necessary costs associated with those acquisitions.  The commissioner may not expend more than $100,000 on any single acquisition pursuant to this subsection without the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. For the purposes of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), "limited practical use" means the designation given to any land or interest therein that has limited practical use because it is located in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area and is held by a landowner who both owns less than 50 acres in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area and has exhausted existing remedies to secure relief, or has such meaning as may be otherwise provided by federal law. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, if the commissioner determines that the costs for surveys, appraisals, or other technical or administrative processes, procedures, or matters associated with the proposed acquisition of any land or interest therein pursuant to subsection a. of this section are disproportionate to the estimated cost of the land or interest therein to be acquired, the commissioner may waive the surveys, appraisals, or other technical or administrative processes, procedures, or matters to the extent necessary to ensure that the transaction shall be cost effective; provided, however, that the current owner of record has marketable title to the land or interest therein at issue, as verified by a 60-year search. (cf: P.L.1995, c.232, s.1) 27.  Section 2 of P.L.1997, c.233 (C.13:18A-57) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  The Pinelands Commission shall develop a pilot program to assist rural Pinelands municipalities in non-growth regions in the [Pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area in identifying economic development opportunities that complement regional requirements for resource protection and in attracting such development to the area. The pilot program shall be developed by the Pinelands Commission, together with several rural municipalities within non-growth areas in the [Pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area chosen by the commission, to enable similarly situated municipalities to match local conditions with compatible economic development opportunities.  The commission shall choose municipalities to participate in the program based on the extent to which: the entire municipality or large portions thereof are located in an environmentally sensitive area; limited sites are available for development; sewer service is unavailable in most of the municipality; large portions of the municipality are owned by the State; and no local resources are available for economic development planning. b.  The Pinelands Commission shall establish a partnership with each municipality participating in the program.  The municipality shall be given technical and other assistance in developing a local economic development entity.  Each local economic development entity shall, together with the commission, perform a community assessment to determine community interests and opportunities for development, and to identify sites for development that are compatible with resource protection and that take into account constraints on the scale of allowable development.  The commission, together with the local economic development entities shall develop strategies for attracting development and shall develop promotional materials for that purpose, and shall develop links with county and regional economic development entities.  The commission shall develop strategies for the expedited review of development applications and permits for such projects. (cf: P.L.1997, c.233, s.2) 28.  Section 11 of P.L.1983, c.560 (C.13:1B-15.143) is amended to read as follows: 11.  Subject to the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes, and within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available, the commissioner may appoint any officer or employee to the department necessary to carry out the provisions of P.L.1983, c.560 (C.13:1B-15.133 et seq.), fix and determine their qualifications, which may include a knowledge of and familiarity with the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area or the Highlands Region and the residents thereof. (cf: P.L.2004, c.120, s.47) 29.  Section 1 of P.L.1997, c.64 (C.13:1B-15.159) is amended to read as follows: 1.    The Department of Environmental Protection, in cooperation with the Division of Travel and Tourism in the Department of State, in consultation with the Pinelands Commission as it affects the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area designated pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11), and in consultation with the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council as it affects the Highlands Region designated pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-7), shall establish a natural resources inventory, using the Geographic Information System, for the purpose of encouraging ecologically based tourism and recreation in New Jersey.  This inventory shall contain information on New Jersey's natural, historic, and recreational resources, and shall include, to the greatest extent possible, but need not be limited to, federal, State, county and local parks, wildlife management areas, hatcheries, natural areas, historic sites, State forests, recreational areas, ecological and biological study sites, reservoirs, marinas, boat launches, campgrounds, waterfront access points, winter sports recreation areas, and national wildlife refuges. (cf: P.L.2007, c.253, s.9) 30.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.306 (C.13:1D-58) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  The provisions of P.L.1993, c.38 (C.13:1D-51 et seq.) shall not apply in the case of conveyances by the State or the department involving an exchange of lands within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, as defined in section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11), or within the Hackensack Meadowlands District, as defined in section 4 of P.L.1968, c.404 (C.13:17-4), or within the Highlands Region as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), to the federal government or any agency or entity thereof, another State agency or entity, or a local unit, provided the lands to be conveyed are used for recreation or conservation purposes, shall continue to be used for recreation or conservation purposes and it has been determined pursuant to subsection c. of this section that the proposed recreation and conservation purposes for the lands do not significantly alter the ecological and environmental value of the lands being exchanged. b.    Prior to any conveyance of lands that is exempted from the provisions of P.L.1993, c.38 (C.13:1D-51 et seq.) pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the Department of Environmental Protection shall conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed conveyance in the municipality in which the lands proposed to be conveyed are located.  The local unit proposing the recreation or conservation use of the lands being exchanged shall present its proposal for the use of the lands being exchanged at the public hearing, including a description of the proposed recreation or conservation use of the lands and any proposed alterations to the lands for the recreation or conservation purposes. c.     As a condition of any conveyance of lands that is exempted from the provisions of P.L.1993, c.38 (C.13:1D-51 et seq.) pursuant to subsection a. of this section, and prior to any public hearing required pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the Pinelands Commission,  the New Jersey Meadowlands Commission, or the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council, as appropriate, after consultation with the local units in which the lands to be conveyed are located, shall determine that the proposed recreation or conservation purpose does not significantly alter the ecological and environmental value of the lands being exchanged.  The appropriate commission or council shall determine that the proposed recreation or conservation purpose does not significantly alter the ecological and environmental value of the lands being exchanged, if: (1)   the appropriate commission or council determines that any proposed recreation or conservation use of the lands being exchanged is consistent with the law, rules and regulations governing the protection and development of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area or pinelands preservation area, as appropriate and as defined in section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11), the Hackensack Meadowlands District, as defined in section 4 of P.L.1968, c.404 (C.13:17-4), or the  Highlands Region, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), and the requirements of the law, rules or regulations have been met to the satisfaction of the appropriate commission or council; and (2)   a portion of the lands would be maintained in an undeveloped or pre-conveyance state and no wetlands would be negatively affected in violation of State or federal law, or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The determinations required pursuant to this subsection shall be made available to the public at the time of the public hearing required pursuant to subsection b. of this section. d.    For the purposes of this section, "local unit" means a municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the State, or any agency thereof authorized to administer, protect, develop and maintain lands for recreation and conservation purposes. (cf: P.L.2004, c.120, s.49) 31. Section 2 of P.L.1996, c.124 (C.13:1E-116.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.): "Closure" means all activities associated with the design, purchase, construction or maintenance of all measures required by the department, pursuant to law, in order to prevent, minimize or monitor pollution or health hazards resulting from municipal solid waste landfills subsequent to the termination of operations at any portion thereof, including, but not necessarily limited to, the placement of final earthen or vegetative cover, the installation of methane gas vents or monitors and leachate monitoring wells or collection systems, and long-term operations and maintenance, at the site of any municipal solid waste landfill that is not listed on the National Priorities List pursuant to the "Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980," 42 U.S.C. s.9605. "Closure and remediation costs" means all reasonable costs associated with the closure and remediation of a municipal solid waste landfill except that "closure and remediation costs" shall not include any costs incurred in financing the closure or remediation. "Commercial solid waste" means any nonhazardous solid waste derived from wholesale, retail or service establishments, including stores, markets, theaters, offices, restaurants, warehouses, or from other non-manufacturing commercial activities. "Developer" means any person that enters or proposes to enter into a redevelopment agreement with the State pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1996, c.124 (C.13:1E-116.3). "Director" means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Household solid waste" means any solid waste derived from households, including but not limited to single and multiple residences, hotels and motels, bunkhouses, ranger stations, crew quarters, campgrounds, picnic grounds and day use recreation areas, except that "household solid waste" shall not include septic waste as defined in section 3 of P.L.1970, c.40 (C.48:13A-3). "Industrial solid waste" means any solid waste derived from manufacturing, industrial and research and development processes and operations that is not a hazardous waste as defined in section 1 of P.L.1976, c.99 (C.13:1E-38), except that "industrial solid waste" shall not include mining waste, oil waste, gas waste, or cement kiln dust waste. "Municipal solid waste landfill" means a landfill that ceased operations prior to January 1, 1982 and received for disposal household solid waste and at least one of the following: (1) commercial solid waste; (2) industrial solid waste; or (3) waste material that was received for disposal prior to October 21, 1976 and that is included within the definition of hazardous waste adopted by the federal government pursuant to the "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act," 42 U.S.C. s.6921 et seq.  A "municipal solid waste landfill" shall not include any landfill that is approved for disposal of hazardous waste and regulated pursuant to Subchapter III of the "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act," 42 U.S.C. s.6921 et seq.  A "municipal solid waste landfill" shall include any "Pinelands municipal landfill" regardless of the date the landfill ceased operations. "Pinelands municipal landfill" means a municipal solid waste landfill that is located in a rural municipality within a non-growth area in the [Pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area as defined in section 3 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-3) and the rural Pinelands municipality within which the landfill is located has participated in the pilot program for rural economic development developed by the Pinelands Commission pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1997, c.233 (C.13:18A-57). "Project" or "redevelopment project" means a specific work or improvement, including lands, buildings, improvements, real and personal property or any interest therein, including lands under water, riparian rights, space rights and air rights, acquired, owned, developed or redeveloped, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated or improved, undertaken by a developer within an area of land whereon a municipal solid waste landfill is or has been located, under a redevelopment agreement with the State pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1996, c.124 (C.13:1E-116.3).  Any redevelopment project to be undertaken by a developer within an area of land whereon a Pinelands municipal landfill is or has been located shall be consistent with the recommendations of the pilot program for rural economic development developed by the Pinelands Commission pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1997, c.233 (C.13:18A-57) and the report thereon submitted to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1997, c.233 (C.13:18A-58). "Redevelopment agreement" means an agreement between the State and a developer under which the developer agrees to perform any work or undertaking necessary for the environmentally sound and proper closure and remediation of the municipal solid waste landfill located at the site of the redevelopment project, and for the clearance, development or redevelopment, construction or rehabilitation of any structure or improvement of commercial, industrial or public structures or improvements within an area of land whereon a municipal solid waste landfill is or has been located pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1996, c.124 (C.13:1E-116.3), and the State agrees that the developer shall be eligible for the reimbursement of 75% of the costs of closure and remediation of the municipal solid waste landfill from the fund established pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1996, c.124 (C.13:1E-116.6) as authorized pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1996, c.124 (C.13:1E-116.4). "Remediation" or "remediate" means all necessary actions to investigate and clean up any known, suspected, or threatened discharge of contaminants, including, as necessary, the preliminary assessment, site investigation, remedial investigation, and remedial action, as those terms are defined in section 23 of P.L.1993, c.139 (C.58:10B-1). (cf: P.L.2001, c.311, s.1) 32.  Section 3 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-31) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a. The department shall establish a forest stewardship program under which an owner, in conjunction with a forester or other professional selected by the owner from a list of foresters approved by the department, or from a list of other professionals authorized by the department in consultation with the forest stewardship advisory committee established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-36), may prepare a forest stewardship plan for land, five acres or greater in area, submit the plan to the department for approval, and implement the plan as approved, or as subsequently amended with the approval of the department. A forest stewardship plan, at a minimum, shall: (1)   conform with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-36) designed to ensure the sustainability of forest lands; (2)   list the owner's long term stewardship goals for the forest land; and, for each year that the plan applies, list the activities to be implemented that year, including the activities designed to ensure the sustainability of the forest land as well as activities designed to eliminate excessive and unnecessary cutting, and provide the rationale for each activity listed; and (3)   establish the monitoring, recordkeeping, and reporting necessary to document implementation of the forest stewardship plan, including documentation of activities and inspections performed. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-34), a forest stewardship plan submitted for land in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall comply with the standards of the comprehensive management plan for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area adopted pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.). b.    The department may elect to inspect the forest land, prior to determining whether to approve a forest stewardship plan, in order to assess the appropriateness and sufficiency of the proposed plan. After the department approves a forest stewardship plan, the forest land shall be subject to inspection by the department during one of the first three years following approval and at least once every three years following the first inspection. c.     A forest stewardship plan shall be valid for a period of 10 years, unless sooner terminated by the owner or revoked by the department.  To continue, without interruption, participation in the forest stewardship program, an owner shall prepare a new or revised forest stewardship plan pursuant to subsection a. of this section and, in accordance with procedures established by the department, obtain the department's approval of the new or revised forest stewardship plan prior to the expiration date of the current forest stewardship plan. d.    A forest stewardship plan approved pursuant to this section shall be considered to be a woodland management plan pursuant to section 3 of the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.3) when the approved forest stewardship plan is submitted as part of an application for valuation, assessment and taxation pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2009, c.256, s.3) 33.  Section 18 of P.L.1985, c.432 (C.13:1M-18) is amended to read as follows: 18.  a.  Nothing in [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) shall be construed to supersede or prohibit the adoption, by the governing body of any municipality or county, of any ordinance or resolution regulating or prohibiting the exploration beyond the reconnaissance phase, drilling for and the extraction of oil and natural gas or uranium.  As used in this section, "reconnaissance" means: (1)   A geologic and mineral resource appraisal of a region by searching and analyzing published literature, aerial photography, and geologic maps; (2)   Use of geophysical, geochemical, and remote sensing techniques that do not involve road building, land clearing or the introduction of chemicals to a land or water area; (3)   Surface geologic, topographic or other mapping and property surveying; or (4)   Sample collections which do not involve excavation or drilling equipment or the introduction of chemicals to land or water area. b.    A municipality or county shall submit a copy of any ordinance or regulation specifically pertaining to activities regulated by [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), or a rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), to the department. c.     The department shall, within 90 days of submittal, approve or disapprove any ordinance or regulation submitted pursuant to subsection b. of this section.  An ordinance or regulation shall be disapproved only if the department finds it unreasonable and provides in writing its reasons for the finding.  The failure of the department to act within 90 days of submittal shall constitute approval. d.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a municipality or county or board of health to enact ordinances or regulations of general applicability to all industrial or commercial activities, including, but not limited to, ordinances and regulations limiting noise, light, and odor. e.     The department shall not approve any ordinance or regulation submitted pursuant to subsection b. of this section which governs activities within the [Pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area designated in the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), unless the Pinelands Commission has approved the ordinance or regulation.  The department shall not disapprove an ordinance or regulation, or portion thereof, which has been certified by the Pinelands Commission as consistent with the requirements of the Comprehensive Management Plan as required by the "Pinelands Protection Act." f.     The department shall not approve any ordinance or regulation submitted pursuant to subsection b. of this section which governs activities within the Highlands preservation area designated in the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.), unless the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council has approved the ordinance or regulation.  The department shall not disapprove an ordinance or regulation, or portion thereof, which has been certified by the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council as consistent with the requirements of the Highlands regional master plan as required by the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act." (cf: P.L.2004, c.120, s.50) 34.  Section 3 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in sections 1 through 42 of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.): "Acquisition" or "acquire" means the obtaining of a fee simple or lesser interest in land, including but not limited to a development easement, a conservation restriction or easement, or any other restriction or easement permanently restricting development, by purchase, installment purchase agreement, gift, donation, eminent domain by the State or a local government unit, or devise; except that any acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes by eminent domain shall be only as authorized pursuant to section 28 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-28); "Bonds" means bonds issued by the trust pursuant to [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Environmental Protection; "Committee" means the State Agriculture Development Committee established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-4); "Constitutionally dedicated moneys" means any moneys made available pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 7 of the State Constitution or through the issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations by the trust, as prescribed by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 7 of the State Constitution and P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), or any moneys from other sources deposited in the trust funds established pursuant to sections 19, 20, and 21 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-19, C.13:8C-20, and C.13:8C-21), and appropriated by law, for any of the purposes set forth in Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 7 of the State Constitution or [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); "Convey" or "conveyance" means to sell, donate, exchange, transfer, or lease for a term of 25 years or more; "Cost" means the expenses incurred in connection with:  all things deemed necessary or useful and convenient for the acquisition or development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes, the acquisition of development easements or fee simple titles to farmland, or the preservation of historic properties, as the case may be; the execution of any agreements or franchises deemed by the Department of Environmental Protection, State Agriculture Development Committee, or New Jersey Historic Trust, as the case may be, to be necessary or useful and convenient in connection with any project funded in whole or in part using constitutionally dedicated moneys; the procurement or provision of appraisal, archaeological, architectural, conservation, design, engineering, financial, geological, historic research, hydrological, inspection, legal, planning, relocation, surveying, or other professional advice, estimates, reports, services, or studies; the purchase of title insurance; the undertaking of feasibility studies; the establishment of a reserve fund or funds for working capital, operating, maintenance, or replacement expenses and for the payment or security of principal or interest on bonds, as the Director of the Office of Management and Budget in the Department of the Treasury may determine; and reimbursement to any fund of the State of moneys that may have been transferred or advanced therefrom to any fund established by [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), or any moneys that may have been expended therefrom for, or in connection with, [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection; "Development" or "develop" means, except as used in the definitions of "acquisition" and "development easement" in this section, any improvement made to a land or water area designed to expand and enhance its utilization for recreation and conservation purposes, and shall include the construction, renovation, or repair of any such improvement, but shall not mean shore protection or beach nourishment or replenishment activities; "Development easement" means an interest in land, less than fee simple title thereto, which interest represents the right to develop that land for all nonagricultural purposes and which interest may be transferred under laws authorizing the transfer of development potential; "Farmland" means land identified as having prime or unique soils as classified by the Natural Resources Conservation Service in the United States Department of Agriculture, having soils of Statewide importance according to criteria adopted by the State Soil Conservation Committee, established pursuant to R.S.4:24-3, or having soils of local importance as identified by local soil conservation districts, and which land qualifies for differential property taxation pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), and any other land on the farm that is necessary to accommodate farm practices as determined by the State Agriculture Development Committee; "Farmland preservation," "farmland preservation purposes," or "preservation of farmland" means the permanent preservation of farmland to support agricultural or horticultural production as the first priority use of that land; "Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund" means the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-20); "Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund" means the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund established pursuant to section 19 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-19); "Garden State Historic Preservation Trust Fund" means the Garden State Historic Preservation Trust Fund established pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-21); "Green Acres bond act" means:  P.L.1961, c.46; P.L.1971, c.165; P.L.1974, c.102; P.L.1978, c.118; P.L.1983, c.354; P.L.1987, c.265; P.L.1989, c.183; P.L.1992, c.88; P.L.1995, c.204; and any State general obligation bond act that may be approved after the date of enactment of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) for the purpose of providing funding for the acquisition or development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes or for farmland preservation purposes; "Historic preservation," "historic preservation purposes," or "preservation of historic properties" means any work relating to the conservation, improvement, interpretation, preservation, protection, rehabilitation, renovation, repair, restoration, or stabilization of any historic property, and shall include any work related to providing access thereto for persons with disabilities; "Historic property" means any area, building, facility, object, property, site, or structure approved for inclusion, or which meets the criteria for inclusion, in the New Jersey Register of Historic Places pursuant to P.L.1970, c.268 (C.13:1B-15.128 et seq.); "Indoor recreation" means active recreation that otherwise is or may be pursued outdoors but, for reasons of extending the season or avoiding inclement weather, is or may be pursued indoors within a fully or partially enclosed building or other structure, and includes basketball, ice skating, racquet sports, roller skating, swimming, and similar recreational activities and sports as determined by the Department of Environmental Protection; "Land" or "lands" means real property, including improvements thereof or thereon, rights-of-way, water, lakes, riparian and other rights, easements, privileges, and all other rights or interests of any kind or description in, relating to, or connected with real property; "Local government unit" means a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the State, or any agency, authority, or other entity thereof; except, with respect to the acquisition and development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes, "local government unit" means a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the State, or any agency, authority, or other entity thereof the primary purpose of which is to administer, protect, acquire, develop, or maintain lands for recreation and conservation purposes; "New Jersey Historic Trust" means the entity established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1967, c.124 (C.13:1B-15.111); "Notes" means the notes issued by the trust pursuant to [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); "Permitted investments" means any of the following securities: (1)   Bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by any agency or instrumentality of the United States to the extent such obligations are guaranteed by the United States or by another such agency the obligations (including guarantees) of which are guaranteed by the United States; (2)   Bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by any corporation chartered by the United States, including, but not limited to, Governmental National Mortgage Association, Federal Land Banks, Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, Federal National Mortgage Association, Federal Home Loan Banks, Federal Intermediate Credit Banks, Banks for Cooperatives, Tennessee Valley Authority, United States Postal Service, Farmers Home Administration, Resolution Funding Corporation, Export-Import Bank, Federal Financing Bank, and Student Loan Marketing Association; (3)   Bonds, debentures, notes, or commercial paper rated in the highest two rating categories without regard to rating subcategories (derogation) by all nationally recognized investment rating agencies or by a nationally recognized investment rating agency if rated by only one nationally recognized investment rating agency; (4)   Repurchase agreements or investment agreements issued by (i) a commercial bank or trust company or a national banking association, each having a capital stock and surplus of more than $100,000,000, or (ii) an insurance company with the highest rating provided by a nationally recognized insurance company rating agency, or (iii) a broker/dealer, or (iv) a corporation; provided that the credit of such commercial bank or trust company or national banking association or insurance company or broker/dealer or corporation, as the case may be, is rated (or, in the case of a broker/dealer or corporation, whose obligations thereunder are guaranteed by a commercial bank or trust company or a national banking association or insurance company with the highest rating provided by a nationally recognized insurance company rating agency or corporation whose credit is rated) not lower than the "AA" category without regard to rating subcategories (derogation) of any two nationally recognized investment rating agencies then rating the State; provided that any such agreement shall provide for the investment of funds and shall be collateralized by obligations described in paragraph 1 or paragraph 2 or paragraph 3 above at a level of at least one hundred and two (102) percent in principal amount of those obligations; ["Pinelands area"] John McPhee pinelands area means the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-3); "Pinelands regional growth area" means a regional growth area established pursuant to the pinelands comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); "Project" means all things deemed necessary or useful and convenient in connection with the acquisition or development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes, the acquisition of development easements or fee simple titles to farmland, or the preservation of historic properties, as the case may be; "Qualifying open space referendum county" means any county that has:  (1) approved and implemented, and is collecting and expending the revenue from, an annual levy authorized pursuant to P.L.1997, c.24 (C.40:12-15.1 et seq.) for an amount or at a rate equivalent to at least one half of one cent per $100 of assessed value of real property, or for an amount or at a rate established by the county and in effect as of April 1, 1999, whichever is greater; or (2) adopted an alternative means of funding for the same or similar purposes as an annual levy, which the Department of Environmental Protection, in consultation with the committee and the New Jersey Historic Trust, approves to be stable and reasonably equivalent in effect to an annual levy; "Qualifying open space referendum municipality" means any municipality that has:  (1) approved and implemented, and is collecting and expending the revenue from, an annual levy authorized pursuant to P.L.1997, c.24 (C.40:12-15.1 et seq.) for an amount or at a rate equivalent to at least one half of one cent per $100 of assessed value of real property, or for an amount or at a rate established by the municipality and in effect as of April 1, 1999, whichever is greater; or (2) adopted an alternative means of funding for the same or similar purposes as an annual levy, which the Department of Environmental Protection, in consultation with the committee and the New Jersey Historic Trust, approves to be stable and reasonably equivalent in effect to an annual levy; "Qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization" means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal taxation pursuant to section 501 (c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.501 (c)(3), and which qualifies for a grant pursuant to section 27, 39, or 41 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-27, 13:8C-39, or 13:8C-41); "Recreation and conservation purposes" means the use of lands for beaches, biological or ecological study, boating, camping, fishing, forests, greenways, hunting, natural areas, parks, playgrounds, protecting historic properties, water reserves, watershed protection, wildlife preserves, active sports, or a similar use for either public outdoor recreation or conservation of natural resources, or both; and "Trust" means the Garden State Preservation Trust established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-4). (cf: P.L.2017, c.131, s.15) 35.  Section 26 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-26) is amended to read as follows: 26.  a.  Moneys appropriated from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection shall be used by the department to: (1)   Pay the cost of acquisition and development of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes; (2)   Provide grants and loans to assist local government units to pay the cost of acquisition and development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes; and (3)   Provide grants to assist qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to pay the cost of acquisition and development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes. b.    The expenditure and allocation of constitutionally dedicated moneys for recreation and conservation purposes shall reflect the geographic diversity of the State to the maximum extent practicable and feasible. c.     (1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-34) or [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, the value of a pinelands development credit, allocated to a parcel pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the pinelands comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant thereto, shall be made utilizing a value to be determined by either appraisal, regional averaging based upon appraisal data, or a formula supported by appraisal data.  The appraisal and appraisal data shall consider as appropriate:  land values in the pinelands regional growth areas; land values in counties, municipalities, and other areas reasonably contiguous to, but outside of, the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area; and other relevant factors as may be necessary to maintain the environmental, ecological, and agricultural qualities of the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. (2)   No pinelands development credit allocated to a parcel of land pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the pinelands comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant thereto that is acquired or obtained in connection with the acquisition of the parcel for recreation and conservation purposes by the State, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part may be conveyed in any manner.  All such pinelands development credits shall be retired permanently. d.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) e.     Moneys appropriated from the fund may be used to match grants, contributions, donations, or reimbursements from federal aid programs or from other public or private sources established for the same or similar purposes as the fund. f.     Moneys appropriated from the fund shall not be used by local government units or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to acquire lands that are already permanently preserved for recreation and conservation purposes, as determined by the department. g.    Whenever lands are donated to the State by a public utility, as defined pursuant to Title 48 of the Revised Statutes, for recreation and conservation purposes, the commissioner may make and keep the lands accessible to the public, unless the commissioner determines that public accessibility would be detrimental to the lands or any natural resources associated therewith. h.    Whenever the State acquires land for recreation and conservation purposes, the agency in the Department of Environmental Protection responsible for administering the land shall, within six months after the date of acquisition, inspect the land for the presence of any buildings or structures thereon which are or may be historic properties and, within 60 days after completion of the inspection, provide to the New Jersey Historic Preservation Office in the department (1) a written notice of its findings, and (2) for any buildings or structures which are or may be historic properties discovered on the land, a request for determination of potential eligibility for inclusion of the historic building or structure in the New Jersey Register of Historic Places.  Whenever such a building or structure is discovered, a copy of the written notice provided to the New Jersey Historic Preservation Office shall also be sent to the New Jersey Historic Trust and to the county historical commission or advisory committee, the county historical society, the local historic preservation commission or advisory committee, and the local historical society if any of those entities exist in the county or municipality wherein the land is located. i.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) j.     (1) Commencing on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and through June 30, 2024 for lands located in the Highlands Region as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), when the department, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization seeks to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part, Green Acres bond act moneys in whole or in part, or constitutionally dedicated CBT moneys pursuant to P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.) in whole or in part, it shall conduct or cause to be conducted an appraisal or appraisals of the value of the lands that shall be made using (a) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect at the time of proposed acquisition, and (b) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect on January 1, 2004.  The higher of those two values shall be utilized by the department, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization as the basis for negotiation with the landowner with respect to the acquisition price for the lands.  The landowner shall be provided with both values determined pursuant to this paragraph. A landowner may waive any of the requirements of this paragraph and may agree to sell the lands for less than the values determined pursuant to this paragraph. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable only to lands the owner of which at the time of proposed acquisition is the same person who owned the lands on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and who has owned the lands continuously since that enactment date, or is an immediate family member of that person. (2)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) (3)   The requirements of this subsection shall be in addition to any other requirements of law, rule, or regulation not inconsistent therewith. (4)   This subsection shall not: (a)   apply in the case of lands to be acquired with federal moneys in whole or in part; (b)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70); or (c)   alter any requirements to disclose information to a landowner pursuant to the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.). (5)   For the purposes of this subsection, "immediate family member" means a spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, first cousin, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half sister, whether the individual is related by blood, marriage, or adoption. k.    The department shall adopt guidelines for the evaluation and priority ranking process which shall be used in making decisions concerning the acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund and from any other source.  The guidelines shall be designed to provide, to the maximum extent practicable and feasible, that such moneys are spent equitably among the geographic areas of the State.  The guidelines, and any subsequent revisions thereto, shall be published in the New Jersey Register.  The adoption of the guidelines or of the revisions thereto, shall not be subject to the requirements of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). l.     In making decisions concerning the acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, in the evaluation and priority ranking process the department shall accord three times the weight to acquisitions of lands that would protect water resources, and two times the weight to acquisitions of lands that would protect flood-prone areas, as those criteria are compared to the other criteria in the priority ranking process. m.   The department, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations that establish standards and requirements regulating any activity on lands acquired by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys to assure that the activity on those lands does not diminish the protection of surface water or groundwater resources. Any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall not apply to activities on lands acquired prior to the adoption of the rules and regulations. n.    (1)  The department, within three months after the date of the first meeting of the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-4), shall consult with and solicit recommendations from the council concerning land preservation strategies and acquisition plans in the Highlands Region as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3). The council's recommendations shall also address strategies and plans concerning establishment by the department of a methodology for prioritizing the acquisition of land in the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, especially with respect to (a) any land that has declined substantially in value due to the implementation of the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.), and (b) any major Highlands development, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), that would have qualified for an exemption pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 30 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-28) but for the lack of a necessary State permit as specified in subparagraph (b) or (c), as appropriate, of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 30 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-28), and for which an application for such a permit had been submitted to the Department of Environmental Protection and deemed by the department to be complete for review on or before March 29, 2004.  The recommendations may also include a listing of specific parcels in the Highlands preservation area that the council is aware of that meet the criteria of subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph and for that reason should be considered by the department as a priority for acquisition, but any such list shall remain confidential notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) or any other law to the contrary. (2)   In making decisions concerning applications for funding submitted by municipalities in the Highlands planning area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), to acquire or develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, in the evaluation and priority ranking process the department shall accord a higher weight to any application submitted by a municipality in the Highlands planning area that has amended its development regulations in accordance with section 13 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-13) to establish one or more receiving zones for the transfer of development potential from the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), than that which is accorded to comparable applications submitted by other municipalities in the Highlands planning area that have not made such amendments to their development regulations. o.    Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) to the contrary, for State fiscal years 2005 through 2009, the sum spent by the department in each of those fiscal years for the acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund in each county of the State shall be not less, and may be greater if additional sums become available, than the average annual sum spent by the department therefor in each such county, respectively, for State fiscal years 2002 through 2004, provided there is sufficient and appropriate lands within the county to be so acquired by the State for such purposes. (cf: P.L.2019, c.136, s.8) 36.  Section 38 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-38) is amended to read as follows: 38.  a.  All acquisitions or grants made pursuant to section 37 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37) shall be made with respect to farmland devoted to farmland preservation under programs established by law. b.    The expenditure and allocation of constitutionally dedicated moneys for farmland preservation purposes shall reflect the geographic diversity of the State to the maximum extent practicable and feasible. c.     The committee shall implement the provisions of section 37 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37) in accordance with the procedures and criteria established pursuant to the "Agriculture Retention and Development Act," P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et seq.) except as provided otherwise by [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.). d.    The committee shall adopt the same or a substantially similar method for determining, for the purposes of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), the committee's share of the cost of a development easement on farmland to be acquired by a local government as that which is being used by the committee on the date of enactment of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) for prior farmland preservation funding programs. e.     Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-31) or [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, whenever the value of a development easement on farmland to be acquired using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part is determined based upon the value of any pinelands development credits allocated to the parcel pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the pinelands comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant thereto, the committee shall determine the value of the development easement by: (1)   conducting a sufficient number of fair market value appraisals as it deems appropriate to determine the value for farmland preservation purposes of the pinelands development credits; (2)   considering development easement values in counties, municipalities, and other areas (a) reasonably contiguous to, but outside of, the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, which in the sole opinion of the committee constitute reasonable development easement values in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area for the purposes of this subsection, and (b) in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area where pinelands development credits are or may be utilized, which in the sole opinion of the committee constitute reasonable development easement values in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area for the purposes of this subsection; (3)   considering land values in the pinelands regional growth areas; (4)   considering the importance of preserving agricultural lands in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area; and (5)   considering such other relevant factors as may be necessary to increase participation in the farmland preservation program by owners of agricultural lands located in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. f.     No pinelands development credit that is acquired or obtained in connection with the acquisition of a development easement on farmland or fee simple title to farmland by the State, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part may be conveyed in any manner.  All such pinelands development credits shall be retired permanently. g.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) h.    Any farmland for which a development easement or fee simple title has been acquired pursuant to section 37 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37) shall be entitled to the benefits conferred by the "Right to Farm Act," P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-1 et al.) and the "Agriculture Retention and Development Act," P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et al.). i.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) j.     (1)  Commencing on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and through June 30, 2024 for lands located in the Highlands Region as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), when the committee, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization seeks to acquire a development easement on farmland or the fee simple title to farmland for farmland preservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part, Green Acres bond act moneys in whole or in part, or constitutionally dedicated CBT moneys pursuant to P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.) in whole or in part, it shall conduct or cause to be conducted an appraisal or appraisals of the value of the lands that shall be made using (a) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect at the time of proposed acquisition, and (b) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect on January 1, 2004.  The higher of those two values shall be utilized by the committee, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization as the basis for negotiation with the landowner with respect to the acquisition price for the lands.  The landowner shall be provided with both values determined pursuant to this paragraph. A landowner may waive any of the requirements of this paragraph and may agree to sell the lands for less than the values determined pursuant to this paragraph. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable only to lands the owner of which at the time of proposed acquisition is the same person who owned the lands on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and who has owned the lands continuously since that enactment date, or is an immediate family member of that person. (2)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) (3)   The requirements of this subsection shall be in addition to any other requirements of law, rule, or regulation not inconsistent therewith. (4)   This subsection shall not: (a)   apply in the case of lands to be acquired with federal moneys in whole or in part; (b)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70); or (c)   alter any requirements to disclose information to a landowner pursuant to the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.). (5)   For the purposes of this subsection, "immediate family member" means a spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, first cousin, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half sister, whether the individual is related by blood, marriage, or adoption. k.    The committee and the Department of Environmental Protection, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall jointly adopt rules and regulations that establish standards and requirements regulating any improvement on lands acquired by the State for farmland preservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys to assure that any improvement does not diminish the protection of surface water or groundwater resources. Any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall not apply to improvements on lands acquired prior to the adoption of the rules and regulations. l.     (1)  The committee, within three months after the date of the first meeting of the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-4), shall consult with and solicit recommendations from the council concerning farmland preservation strategies and acquisition plans in the Highlands Region as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3). The council's recommendations shall also address strategies and plans concerning establishment by the committee of a methodology for prioritizing the acquisition of development easements and fee simple titles to farmland in the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), for farmland preservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund, especially with respect to farmland that has declined substantially in value due to the implementation of the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.).  The recommendations may also include a listing of specific parcels in the Highlands preservation area that the council is aware of that have experienced a substantial decline in value and for that reason should be considered by the committee as a priority for acquisition, but any such list shall remain confidential notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) or any other law to the contrary. (2)   In prioritizing applications for funding submitted by local government units in the Highlands planning area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), to acquire development easements on farmland in the Highlands planning area using moneys from the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund, the committee shall accord a higher weight to any application submitted by a local government unit to preserve farmland in a municipality in the Highlands planning area that has amended its development regulations in accordance with section 13 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-13) to establish one or more receiving zones for the transfer of development potential from the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), than that which is accorded to comparable applications submitted by other local government units to preserve farmland in municipalities in the Highlands planning area that have not made such amendments to their development regulations. m.   Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) to the contrary, for State fiscal years 2005 through 2009, the sum spent by the committee in each of those fiscal years for the acquisition by the committee of development easements and fee simple titles to farmland for farmland preservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund in each county of the State shall be not less, and may be greater if additional sums become available, than the average annual sum spent by the department therefor in each such county, respectively, for State fiscal years 2002 through 2004, provided there is sufficient and appropriate farmland within the county to be so acquired by the committee for such purposes. (cf: P.L.2019, c.136, s.9) 37.  Section 3 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-9.2) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a. The committee shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.): (1)   such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the implementation of subsection i. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-9); and (2)   agricultural management practices for biomass energy generation on commercial farms, including, but not necessarily limited to, standards for the management of odor, dust, and noise. b.    The Board of Public Utilities shall provide technical assistance and support to the State Agriculture Development Committee with regard to the committee's responsibilities in connection with this section and subsection i. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-9). c.     Notwithstanding any provision of this section or subsection i. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-9) to the contrary, the construction, installation, or operation of any biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facility, structure, or equipment in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, as defined and regulated by the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), shall comply with the standards of P.L.1979, c.111 and the comprehensive management plan for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area adopted pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111. d.    For the purposes of this section and subsection i. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-9), "biomass" means an agricultural crop, crop residue, or agricultural byproduct that is cultivated, harvested, or produced on the commercial farm and which can be used to generate energy in a sustainable manner. (cf: P.L.2009, c.213, s.3) 38.  Section 1 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.4) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a person who owns preserved farmland may construct, install, and operate biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment on the farm, whether on the preserved portion of the farm or on any portion excluded from preservation, for the purpose of generating power or heat, and may make improvements to any agricultural, horticultural, residential, or other building or structure on the land for that purpose, provided that the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment: (1)   do not interfere significantly with the use of the land for agricultural or horticultural production, as determined by the committee; (2)   are owned by the landowner, or will be owned by the landowner upon the conclusion of the term of an agreement with the installer of the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, or equipment by which the landowner uses the income or credits realized from the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation to purchase the facilities, structures, or equipment; (3)   are used to provide power or heat to the farm, either directly or indirectly, or to reduce, through net metering or similar programs and systems, energy costs on the farm; and (4) are limited (a) in annual energy generation capacity to the previous calendar year's energy demand plus 10 percent, in addition to what is allowed under subsection b. of this section, or alternatively at the option of the landowner (b) to occupying no more than one percent of the area of the entire farm including both the preserved portion and any portion excluded from preservation. The person who owns the farm and the energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment may only sell energy through net metering or as otherwise permitted under an agreement allowed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. b.    The limit on the annual energy generation capacity established pursuant to subparagraph (a) of paragraph (4) of subsection a. of this section shall not include energy generated from facilities, structures, or equipment existing on the roofs of buildings or other structures on the farm as of the date of enactment of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.4 et al.). c.     A landowner shall seek and obtain the approval of the committee before constructing, installing, and operating biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment on the farm as allowed pursuant to subsection a. of this section. The committee shall provide the holder of any development easement on the farm with a copy of the application submitted for the purposes of subsection a. of this section, and the holder of the development easement shall have 30 days within which to provide comments to the committee on the application.  The committee shall, within 90 days of receipt, approve, disapprove, or approve with conditions an application submitted for the purposes of subsection a. of this section.  The decision of the committee on the application shall be based solely upon the criteria listed in subsection a. of this section and comments received from the holder of the development easement. d.    No fee shall be charged of the landowner for review of an application submitted to, or issuance of a decision by, the committee pursuant to this section. e.     The committee may suspend or revoke an approval issued pursuant to this section for a violation of any term or condition of the approval or any provision of this section. f.     The committee, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Agriculture, shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section, including provisions prescribing standards concerning impervious cover which may be permitted in connection with biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment authorized to be constructed, installed, and operated on lands pursuant to this section. g.    In the case of biomass energy generation facilities, structures, or equipment, the landowner shall also seek and obtain the approval of the Department of Agriculture as required pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.5) if the land is valued, assessed and taxed pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.). h.    Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the construction, installation, or operation of any biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facility, structure, or equipment in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, as defined and regulated by the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), shall comply with the standards of P.L.1979, c.111 and the comprehensive management plan for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area adopted pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111. i.     For the purposes of this section: "Biomass" means an agricultural crop, crop residue, or agricultural byproduct that is cultivated, harvested, or produced on the farm and which can be used to generate energy in a sustainable manner. "Net metering" means the same as that term is used for purposes of subsection e. of section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87). "Preserved farmland" means land on which a development easement was conveyed to, or retained by, the committee, a board, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization pursuant to the provisions of section 24 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-31), section 5 of P.L.1988, c.4 (C.4:1C-31.1), section 1 of P.L.1989, c.28 (C.4:1C-38), section 1 of P.L.1999, c.180 (C.4:1C-43.1), sections 37 through 40 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37 through C.13:8C-40), or any other State law enacted for farmland preservation purposes. (cf: P.L.2009, c.213, s.1) 39.  Section 5 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.  No person may construct, install, or operate biomass energy generation facilities, structures, or equipment on any land that is valued, assessed and taxed pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), without the approval of the Department of Agriculture, in addition to any other approvals that may be required by law. b.    The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations concerning:  (1) the construction, installation, and operation of biomass energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment and the management of biomass fuel for such facilities, structures, and equipment on farms; and (2) the process by which a landowner may apply for the approval required pursuant to subsection a. of this section, including establishment of reasonable application fees, if necessary, to help pay for the cost of review of the application, except no application fee may be charged for preserved farmland as defined in section 1 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.4). c.     Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the construction, installation, or operation of any biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facility, structure, or equipment in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, as defined and regulated by the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), shall comply with the standards of P.L.1979, c.111 and the comprehensive management plan for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area adopted pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111. d.    For the purposes of this section, "biomass" means an agricultural crop, crop residue, or agricultural byproduct that is cultivated, harvested, or produced on the farm, or directly obtained from a farm where it was cultivated, harvested, or produced, and which can be used to generate energy in a sustainable manner, except with respect to preserved farmland, "biomass" means the same as that term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.4). (cf: P.L.2009, c.213, s.5) 40.  Section 29 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-36) is amended to read as follows: 29.  Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit the creation of a municipally approved program or other farmland preservation program, the purchase of development easements, or the extension of any other benefit herein provided on land, and to owners thereof, in the [Pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C. 13:18A-3), or in the Highlands Region, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3). (cf: P.L.2004, c.120, s.45) 41.  Section 8 of P.L.1997, c.236 (C.4:27-8) is amended to read as follows: 8.    Within 180 days after the effective date of P.L.1997, c.236 (C.4:27-1 et al.), the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the Aquaculture Advisory Council, the Shellfisheries Council and the Pinelands Commission as it affects the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area designated pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11), jointly shall establish, according to rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), appropriate policies for the use of aquaculture leases in waters of the State and for lands underneath waters of the State, including but not limited to lease specifications, fees, royalty payments, and assignability and termination of lease agreements.  The policies shall provide for an expeditious procedure for finalizing lease agreements.  Lease agreements shall convey a necessary degree of exclusivity to minimize the risks to the aquaculturists caused by pollution, vandalism, theft, and other forms of encroachment, while protecting common use rights of the public, and assuring the integrity and protection of the natural wild stocks and their habitat. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.1) 42.  Section 11 of P.L.1997, c.236 (C.4:27-11) is amended to read as follows: 11.  The Department of Environmental Protection, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, the Pinelands Commission as it affects the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area designated pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11),and the Aquaculture Advisory Council, shall review the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to endangered and nongame species, migratory birds, and fish and game species with regard to the application and effectiveness of those laws, rules, and regulations in the  prevention of predation at aquaculture facilities or sites.  Based upon that review, the Department of Environmental Protection in conjunction with the various other entities conducting the review, after allowing for a period of public review and comment and within one year of the effective date of [this act] P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), shall make recommendations to all appropriate governmental entities concerning implementation, to the extent permitted by law and as soon as may be practical and feasible, of procedures and mechanisms for the timely and cost effective resolution of specific predation problems occurring at aquaculture facilities or sites. (cf: P.L.1997, c.236, s.11) 43.  Section 20 of P.L.1997, c.236 (C.4:27-20) is amended to read as follows: 20.  The Office of State Planning established pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-201), in consultation with the Pinelands Commission as it affects the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area designated pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11), shall develop, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), an aquaculture component for model planning and zoning ordinances. (cf: P.L.1997, c.236, s.20) 44.  Section 6 of P.L.2004, c.2 (C.40:55D-142) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a. Any municipality located in whole or in part in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, as defined in the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), shall submit the proposed development transfer ordinance, development transfer and utility service plan elements of the master plan, real estate market analysis, and capital improvement program to the Pinelands Commission for review for those areas included in that proposed ordinance that are situated within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area.  The Pinelands Commission shall determine whether the proposed ordinance is compatible with the provisions of the "Pinelands Development Credit Bank Act," P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-30 et seq.) and is otherwise consistent with the comprehensive management plan adopted by the Pinelands Commission pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.).  If the commission determines that the proposed development transfer ordinance is not compatible or consistent, the commission shall make such recommendations as may be necessary to conform the proposed ordinance with the comprehensive management plan.  The municipality shall not adopt the proposed ordinance unless the changes recommended by the Pinelands Commission have been included in the ordinance. b.    No development transfer ordinance that involves land in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall take effect unless it has been certified by the Pinelands Commission pursuant to the provisions of the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the comprehensive management plan. (cf: P.L.2004, c.2, s.6) 45.  Section 20 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.54:1-84) is amended to read as follows: 20.  a.  The "Pinelands Property Tax Assistance Fund" is established in the General Fund as a special nonlapsing fund for the purpose of providing State aid to qualifying municipalities in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall serve as administrator of the fund. b.    Every qualifying municipality in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area shall be eligible for State aid made with monies in the fund.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall annually distribute to each qualifying municipality in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area a percentage of the monies annually allocated to the fund equal to the percentage the qualifying municipality received of the total sum distributed from the "Pinelands Municipal Property Tax Stabilization Fund" pursuant to P.L.1983, c.551 (C.54:1-68 et seq.). c.     The State Treasurer shall annually credit, in each of the first five years after the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.), to the "Pinelands Property Tax Assistance Fund" from the "Highlands Protection Fund" established pursuant to section 21 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-19), the sum of $1,800,000. d.    Any State aid made available with monies from the "Pinelands Property Tax Assistance Fund" pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other moneys appropriated or otherwise made available pursuant to any other federal or State program for the same category of aid. e.     Any qualifying municipality receiving State aid pursuant to this section shall anticipate those sums in its annual budget or any amendments or supplements thereto as a direct offset to the amount to be raised by taxation. f.     The Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs shall make such changes in the budget of any qualifying municipality to ensure that all sums received pursuant to this section are utilized as a direct offset to the amount to be raised by taxation and shall make such changes therein as the director deems necessary to ensure that the offset occurs. g.    Any sum received by a qualifying municipality pursuant to this section shall not be considered as an exception or exemption under P.L.1976, c.68 (C.40A:4-45.1 et seq.). h.    Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Local Budget Law"  (N.J.S.40A:4-1 et seq.), a qualifying municipality which is due a payment pursuant to this section may anticipate the amount of the entitlement in its annual budget for the year in which the payment is made. i.     The Director of the Division of Local Government Services shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. j.     As used in this section: ["Pinelands area"] John McPhee pinelands area means the area so designated in section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11); and "Qualifying municipality" means any municipality that received State aid distributed from the "Pinelands Municipal Property Tax Stabilization Fund" pursuant to P.L.1983, c.551 (C.54:1-68 et seq.). k.    This section shall expire July 1 next following one year after the date the last State aid payment is made to a qualifying municipality in the fifth year as provided pursuant to subsection c. of this section. (cf: P.L.2004, c.120, s.20) 46.  Section 4 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.54:4-23.3c) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  (1)  No land used for biomass, solar, or wind energy generation shall be considered land in agricultural or horticultural use or actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use for the purposes of the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), except as provided in this section or, in the case of unpreserved farmland used for a dual-use solar energy project, as provided in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.170 (C.48:3-87.13). (2)   No generated energy from any source shall be considered an agricultural or horticultural product. b.    Land used for biomass, solar, or wind energy generation may be eligible for valuation, assessment and taxation pursuant to P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), provided that: (1)   the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment were constructed, installed, and operated on property that is part of an operating farm continuing to be in operation as a farm in the tax year for which the valuation, assessment and taxation pursuant to P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.) is applied for; (2)   in the tax year preceding the construction, installation, and operation of the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment on an operating farm, the acreage used for the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment was valued, assessed and taxed as land in agricultural or horticultural use; (3)   the power or heat generated by the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment is used to provide, either directly or indirectly but not necessarily exclusively, power or heat to the farm or agricultural or horticultural operations supporting the viability of the farm; (4)   the owner of the property has filed a conservation plan with the soil conservation district, with provisions for compliance with paragraph (5) of this subsection where applicable, to account for the aesthetic, impervious coverage, and environmental impacts of the construction, installation, and operation of the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment, including, but not necessarily limited to, water recapture and filtration, and the conservation plan has been approved by the district; (5)   where solar energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment are installed, the property under the solar panels is used to the greatest extent practicable for the farming of shade crops or other plants capable of being grown under such conditions, or for pasture for grazing; (6)   the amount of acreage devoted to the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment does not exceed a ratio of one to five acres, or portion thereof, of land devoted to energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment and land devoted to agricultural or horticultural operations; (7)   biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment are constructed or installed on no more than 10 acres of the farmland for which the owner of the property is applying for valuation, assessment and taxation pursuant to P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), and if power is being generated, no more than two megawatts of power are generated on the 10 acres or less; and (8)   for biomass energy generation, the owner of the property has obtained the approval of the Department of Agriculture pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.5). c.     No income from any power or heat sold from the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation may be considered income for eligibility for valuation, assessment and taxation of land pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), and, notwithstanding the provisions of that act, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, there shall be no income requirement for property valued, assessed and taxed pursuant to subsection b. of this section. d.    Notwithstanding any provision of this section, section 3 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.3), or section 4 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.4) to the contrary, the construction, installation, or operation of any biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facility, structure, or equipment in the [pinelands area] John McPhee  pinelands area, as defined and regulated by the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.), shall comply with the standards of P.L.1979, c.111 and the comprehensive management plan for the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area adopted pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111. e.     The Division of Taxation, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the implementation and administration of this section. f.     For the purposes of this section: "Biomass" means an agricultural crop, crop residue, or agricultural byproduct that is cultivated, harvested, or produced on the farm, or directly obtained from a farm where it was cultivated, harvested, or produced, and which can be used to generate energy in a sustainable manner, except with respect to preserved farmland, "biomass" means the same as that term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.4). "Dual-use solar energy project" means the same as the term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.170 (C.48:3-87.13). "Land used for biomass, solar, or wind energy generation" means the land upon which the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation facilities, structures, and equipment are constructed, installed, and operated. In the case of biomass energy generation, "land used for biomass, solar, or wind energy generation" shall not mean the land upon which agricultural or horticultural products used as fuel in the biomass energy generation facility, structure, or equipment are grown. "Land used for biomass, solar, or wind energy generation" shall not include land used for a dual-use solar energy project. "Preserved farmland" means land on which a development easement was conveyed to, or retained by, the State Agriculture Development Committee, a county agriculture development board, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization pursuant to the provisions of section 24 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-31), section 5 of P.L.1988, c.4 (C.4:1C-31.1), section 1 of P.L.1989, c.28 (C.4:1C-38), section 1 of P.L.1999, c.180 (C.4:1C-43.1), sections 37 through 40 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37 through C.13:8C-40), or any other State law enacted for farmland preservation purposes. "Unpreserved farmland" means the same as the term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.170 (C.48:3-87.13). (cf: P.L.2021, c.170, s.3) 47.  R.S.58:4-1 is amended to read as follows: 58:4-1.  a.  No municipality, corporation or person shall, without the consent of the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, hereafter in this chapter designated as the commissioner, build any reservoir or construct any dam, or repair, alter or improve existing dams on any river or stream in this State or between this State and any other state which will raise the waters of the river or stream more than five feet above its usual mean low-water height. No municipality, corporation or person shall, without the consent of the commissioner, build any reservoir or construct any dam, or repair, alter or improve existing dams in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, as designated by subsection a. of section 10 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-11), which will raise the waters of any river or stream more than eight feet above the surface of the ground where the drainage area above the dam or reservoir is more than one square mile in extent and where the water surface created by the dam or reservoir is more than 100 acres in extent. The commissioner may investigate and take appropriate action regarding any dam or reservoir about which the commissioner has a security or safety concern. With respect to dams and reservoirs located on lands utilized for agricultural or horticultural purposes within the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area, the commissioner's actions shall be undertaken after consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture. b.    The commissioner shall not require a permit for the repair of any dam used for agricultural purposes within a special agricultural production area designated pursuant to N.J.A.C.7:50-5.14 in the [pinelands area] John McPhee pinelands area. (cf: P.L.2001, c.82, s.1) 48.  This act shall take effect immediately.